Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 4 Appropriations, Finance, and Acquisition of Property

38-2-170.
Military appropriations; military fund created; use of military funds.

The General Assembly shall appropriate from time to time a sufficient sum of money, based on estimates and recommendations made by the adjutant general and approved by the Governor, for the purpose of paying the expenses incident to carrying out this chapter. All money so appropriated by the General Assembly shall continue and be kept in the state treasury as a separate fund to be known as the “military fund.” None of the moneys placed in the military fund shall be converted into the general fund of the state treasury, and no part of the military fund shall be used for any purpose except as shall be authorized by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-901; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 62.

38-2-171.
Appropriations for units of organized militia; apportionment by adjutant general.

Out of the funds appropriated for the military fund the adjutant general, in his discretion, may allocate to the units of the organized militia moneys for rental, maintenance, and utility expense of unit facilities and for the welfare of the members of the units. The expenditure of the funds shall be in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-904; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 21; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 63.

38-2-172.
Transfer of funds in emergency; funds used in event of invasion.

When the available funds are not sufficient for the purpose of paying the expenses incident to carrying out this chapter, the Governor may transfer from any available fund in the state treasury such sum as may be necessary to meet such emergency, and the moneys so transferred shall be repaid to the fund from which transferred when moneys become available for that purpose by legislative appropriation or otherwise.

In the event of invasion of the state by land, sea, or air, the funds referred to in Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of this state may be utilized on the executive order of the Governor for defense purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 64; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 59.

38-2-173.
Governor authorized to borrow money.

When there is no state appropriation or funds available for the purpose of paying the expenses incident to carrying out the provisions of this chapter having reference to repelling an invasion, suppressing an insurrection, or defending the state in time of war, as authorized by Article VII, Section IV, Paragraphs I and VI of the Constitution of this state, the Governor may borrow money for such purpose in such sum or sums as may from time to time be required; and any such loans so obtained shall be promptly repaid out of the first funds that become available for such use.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 65; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 59.

38-2-174.
Governor authorized to accept donations for organized militia.

The Governor, in his discretion, may accept donations of money and property, both real and personal, to be used for military purposes by the organized militia under such conditions as the donor may designate.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1410; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 104.

38-2-175.
Governor authorized to obtain all federal appropriations, property, and equipment.

The Governor may initiate and take such action as he may deem proper to obtain all appropriations, property, and equipment as may be provided by the United States for the use, training, equipping, or benefit of the organized militia.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 66.

38-2-176.
Appropriations of money or property by counties or municipal corporations for local military units.

The governing authorities of the counties and municipal corporations of the state are authorized to make appropriations from the funds of such counties and municipal corporations and to donate property, both real and personal, of the counties and municipal corporations for the support and maintenance of local forces of the organized militia as, in their discretion, they may deem meet and proper. A force of the organized militia shall be deemed to be a local force although its headquarters may be located in a county adjoining the county or adjoining the county in which the municipal corporation may be located, the governing authority of which desires to make any such appropriations, provided that a substantial number of its personnel are residents of such county or municipal corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-905; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 21; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 67.

38-2-177.
Establishment of defense finance and accounting services facility; steps toward establishment; intergovernmental cooperation.

The General Assembly finds and declares that great public benefit shall result from cooperation among the United States, the state, the counties and municipal corporations of the state, and public authorities with respect to the national, state, and local defense. In particular, such benefit will result from competing and contracting for the establishment of a Defense Finance and Accounting Services facility in Georgia pursuant to the Opportunity for Economic Growth program of the United States Department of Defense and the Base Closure and Realignment Commission proceedings of the United States. Such benefits will include enhanced performance of defense functions, increased job opportunities, increased opportunity for job training and creating a skilled work force, enhanced economic activity, and increased governmental revenues. Pursuant to that finding and declaration, it is further declared to be a significant and important public purpose for the state and local governments to enter into such competition and agreements on such terms and conditions as they may determine in accord with the following:

The Department of Defense is authorized to acquire, by purchase, gift, condemnation, or otherwise, construct, establish, operate, maintain, repair, and replace a finance and accounting facility for defense purposes;

In connection therewith, with the approval of the Governor, the Department of Defense may compete and contract for the establishment of a Defense Finance and Accounting Services facility in Georgia pursuant to the Opportunity for Economic Growth program of the United States Department of Defense and the Base Closure and Realignment Commission proceedings of the United States;

In connection therewith, the department may enter into contracts with the United States, not exceeding 50 years in term, by which the state agrees to make services and facilities available to the United States for purposes of the national defense, or by which the United States makes services and facilities available to the state or its authorities for purposes of the state or national defense; and

In connection therewith, any other state agency or instrumentality shall be authorized to participate with the department or separately for the purpose of providing or receiving services or facilities consistent with its public functions.

In consideration of the mutual public purposes and pursuant to intergovernmental contract, the governing authorities of the counties, municipal corporations, and local authorities of the state are authorized to make appropriations from the funds of such counties, municipal corporations, and local authorities and are authorized to lease, lend, sell, grant, or donate services and property, both real and personal, of the counties and municipal corporations to the state and the federal government for purposes of local, state, and national defense and for the use of the organized militia. For such purposes they may exercise the power of eminent domain. Any donation of real property to the state by a county, municipal corporation, or local authority, with a provision in such a gift that the property shall be used for military purposes and should the property not be used for military purposes the same shall revert to the donor, shall be a valid gift; and if the property can be used by the state for military purposes it may be accepted by the Governor with such conditions and reverter, but the Governor may require the conveyance of a full fee and that likewise shall be a valid conveyance. When so accepted it shall be lawful to expend funds appropriated or otherwise authorized, including proceeds of general obligation debt, for the support of the militia to improve the property with an armory or other military facilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 68; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1, § 1.